Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6111.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. In all respects in which the amendments to the Home Rule Charter of the
town of Tiverton, which amendments were adopted and approved by the electors of the town of
Tiverton on November 5, 2024, may require ratification, confirmation, validation, or enactment by
the general assembly, but in no other respects, the provisions of said amendments to the Home Rule
Charter of the town of Tiverton are hereby ratified, confirmed, validated, and enacted. It is the
express intention of the general assembly, by the passage of this act, to give effect to, ratify,
confirm, validate, and enact those provisions of the said amendments to the Home Rule Charter of
the town of Tiverton which require ratification, confirmation, validation, or enactment and, by the
passage of this act, the legislature does hereby ratify, confirm, validate, and enact said provisions,
but nothing in this act shall be construed to abrogate or impair the powers now or hereafter granted
to towns by the home rule amendment and other applicable laws of the State of Rhode Island or
those rights retained by said town of Tiverton in its Home Rule Charter.
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act, or the application thereof to the town of Tiverton
or to any person or circumstances, is deemed invalid for any reason, the remainder of this act, or
the application of such provision to said town or other persons or circumstances, shall not be
affected thereby and, to this end, the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001052
========
LC001052 - Page 2 of 3